Utah statutes.
13-32-104.   Receipts and transaction records -- Retention of receipts and
transaction records.
(1)  Every vendor shall maintain receipts or a permanent record book for the
acquisition of new and unused property which shall contain:
(a)  the date of the transaction on which the property was acquired;
(b)  the name and address of the person from whom the property was acquired;
(c)  an identification and description of the property acquired;
(d)  the price paid for such property; and
(e)  the signatures of the person selling the property and the vendor.
(2)  The receipt or record for each transaction required by Subsection (1)
shall be maintained by the vendor for a period of not less than one year
following the date of the transaction.
